



FDA Warns About Stem Cell Claims





















































  


Skip to main page content
Skip to search
Skip to topics menu
Skip to common links




 
 







HHS
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services

 




  U.S. Food and Drug Administration

 
 




A to Z Index
Follow FDA
En Español


 




Search FDA


Submit search














 
 
 
 










For Consumers







 en Español


 

 






Home

For Consumers

Consumer Updates











FDA Warns About Stem Cell Claims





Share


Tweet


Linkedin


Pin it


More sharing options


Linkedin


Pin it




Email


Print






  Researchers hope that stem cells will one day be effective in the treatment of many medical conditions and diseases.  Get Consumer Updates by E-mail  Consumer Updates RSS Feed  Download PDF (344 K) On this page   Regulation of Stem Cells Advice for Consumers  Thwarting a Stem Cell Scheme  Stem cell therapies offer the potential to treat diseases or conditions for which few treatments exist. Stem cells, sometimes called the body’s “master cells,” are the precursor cells that develop into blood, brain, bones and all of your organs. Their promise in medical treatments is that they have the potential to repair, restore, replace and regenerate cells that could then be used to treat many medical conditions and diseases. But the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is concerned that the hope that patients have for cures not yet available may leave them vulnerable to unscrupulous providers of stem cell treatments that are illegal and potentially harmful. FDA cautions consumers to make sure that any stem cell treatment they are considering has been approved by FDA or is being studied under a clinical investigation that has been submitted to and allowed to proceed by FDA. FDA has approved only one stem cell product, Hemacord, a cord blood-derived product manufactured by the New York Blood Center and used for specified indications in patients with disorders affecting the body’s blood-forming system. back to top Regulation of Stem Cells FDA regulates stem cells in the U.S. to ensure that they are safe and effective for their intended use. “Stem cells can come from many different sources and under the right conditions can give rise to many different cell types,” says Stephanie Simek, Ph.D., deputy director of FDA’s Office of Cellular, Tissue and Gene Therapies. Stem cells that come from bone marrow or blood are routinely used in transplant procedures to treat patients with cancer and other disorders of the blood and immune system. Umbilical cord blood is collected from a placenta with the birth mother’s consent. Cord blood cells are then isolated, processed, and frozen and stored in a cord blood bank for future use. Cord blood is regulated by FDA and cord blood banks must follow regulatory requirements. But there are many other stem cell products, including other cord blood-derived products, that have been reviewed by FDA for use in investigational studies, says Simek.  Investigational products undergo a thorough review process as the sponsor prepares to study the safety and effectiveness of the product in adequate and well-controlled human studies (clinical trials). As part of this review, the sponsor must show how the product will be manufactured so that FDA can make certain that appropriate steps are being taken to help assure the product’s safety, purity and potency. FDA also requires that there be sufficient data generated from animal studies to aid in evaluating any potential risks associated with the use of these products. Consumers need to be aware that at present—other than cord blood for certain specified indications—there are no approved stem cell products. back to top  Advice for Consumers  If you are considering stem cell treatment in the U.S., ask your physician if the necessary FDA approval has been obtained or if you will be part of an FDA-regulated clinical study. This also applies if the stem cells are your own. Even if the cells are yours, there are safety risks, including risks introduced when the cells are manipulated after removal.      “There is a potential safety risk when you put cells in an area where they are not performing the same biological function as they were when in their original location in the body,” says Simek. Cells in a different environment may multiply, form tumors, or may leave the site you put them in and migrate somewhere else.       If you are considering having stem cell treatment in another country, learn all you can about regulations covering the products in that country. Exercise caution before undergoing treatment with a stem cell-based product in a country that—unlike the U.S.—may not require clinical studies designed to demonstrate that the product is safe and effective. FDA does not regulate stem cell treatments used solely in countries other than the United States and typically has little information about foreign establishments or their stem cell products.  back to top Thwarting a Stem Cell Scheme In December 2011, three men were arrested in the United States and charged with 15 counts of criminal activity related to manufacturing, selling and using stem cells without FDA sanction or approval. According to the criminal indictment, one of the accused, a licensed midwife who operated a maternity care clinic in Texas, obtained umbilical cord blood from birth mothers, telling them it was for “research” purposes. Instead, the midwife sold the cord blood to a laboratory in Arizona which, in turn, sent the blood to a paid consultant at a university in South Carolina. The owner of the laboratory in Arizona was convicted in August 2011 of unlawfully introducing stem cells into interstate commerce.  She faces up to 3 years in prison and a fine of up to $10,000. The consultant, an assistant professor, used university facilities to manufacture stem cell products. He then sent the products back to the lab, which sold them to a man representing himself as a physician licensed in the U.S. The man then traveled to Mexico to perform unapproved stem cell procedures on people suffering from cancer, multiple sclerosis and other autoimmune diseases. The three defendants allegedly received more than $1.5 million from patients seeking treatment for incurable diseases. “Scammers like these offer false hope to people with incurable diseases in order to line their own pockets with money,” says Special Agent in Charge Patrick J. Holland of FDA’s Office of Criminal Investigations (OCI), Kansas City Field Office. “FDA will continue to aggressively pursue perpetrators who expose the American public to the dangers of unapproved stem cells and ensure that they are punished to the full extent of the law.” FDA’s OCI worked the case with the Federal Bureau of Investigations and the Internal Revenue Service’s Criminal Investigations Division. This article appears on FDA's Consumer Updates page, which features the latest on all FDA-regulated products. Jan. 6, 2012 back to top








 
							
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
										  
 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
						
							  
								
For More Information
Consumer Information on Stem Cells


What are stem cells?  How are they regulated?


Health Fraud Scams

 			
							
					  
 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
						
							  
								
Related Consumer Updates
Adult Stem Cell Research Shows Promise


Don't Be Fooled By Health Fraud Scams


FDA 101: Health Fraud Awareness


Cord Blood: What You Need to Know

 			
							
					  
 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
  
				     
		
					 				
		 
			  
					 
				 
							
					 				
	
	







More in Consumer Updates
Animal & Veterinary
Children's Health
Cosmetics 
Dietary Supplements 
Drugs
Food
Medical Devices 
Nutrition
Radiation-Emitting Products 
Tobacco Products
Vaccines, Blood & Biologics 

Articulos en Espanol
Alimentos y Bebidas
Cosméticos
Dispositivos Médicos
Dispositivos que Emiten Radiación
Fraude en la Salud
Medicamentos
Nutrición
Productos Veterinarios
Productos de Tabaco
Salud Infantil
Salud de la Mujer
Suplementos Dietéticos
Vacunas, Sangre y Productos Biológicos

 
















	Page Last Updated: 06/22/2015


	Note: If you need help accessing information in different file formats, see Instructions for Downloading Viewers and Players.
   Language Assistance Available: Español | 繁體中文 | Tiếng Việt | 한국어 | Tagalog | Русский | العربية | Kreyòl Ayisyen | Français | Polski | Português | Italiano | Deutsch | 日本語 | فارسی | English






 






















StemCells, Inc. | Company Spotlight Profile











Warning! This site has features that require JavaScript.












watch








        StemCells, Inc.
        
      

Sector: 


            Biological Products Except Diagnostic Substances
          
Region: 

CA, United States


 
  : 

|
Nasdaq: STEM


  



Listed in: 
Healthcare & Pharmaceuticals


        Similar to:
Bebra Biogas Holding AG, 
        Inovio Pharmaceuticals, Inc.





♣ Request Investor Kit

 View Contact Details







 News & Analysis
















 Featured Company


The Central Europe, Russia and Turkey Fund Inc.
New York, NY, US








 You may also be interested in:





Inovio Pharmaceuticals, Inc.



Blue Bell, PA, US
Inovio is taking immunotherapy to the next level in the fight against cancer and infectious diseases. We are the only...




Bebra Biogas Holding AG



Hamburg, HA, DE





Blonder Tongue Laboratories, Inc.



Old Bridge, NJ, US
Blonder Tongue Laboratories  makes the TV entertainment and internet experience better in a wide range of markets and businesses including:...










×
Contact Investor Relations



StemCells, Inc.
Investor Relations
         7707 Gateway BoulevardSuite 140
         Newark , CA 94560
         United States
Phone:1.510.456.4000

SIC Code:
2836



Close




×
Request Investor Kit









Select your country:


Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire, St. Eust., Saba
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
Brit. Indian Ocean Terr.
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo (Dem. Rep. of the)
Congo (Rep. of)
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Terr.
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard & McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
La Reunion
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marianas
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthelemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre & Miquelon
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Marten
Slovakia
Slovenia
So Georgia & So Sand Isl
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Vincent & Grenadines
St. Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Minor Outlying Isl.
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis & Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe





E-mail:


required field!



First Name:


required field!



Last Name:


required field!




Street 1:


required field!



Street 2:





City:


required field!



State/Province:


-
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming


required field!



Postal Code:


required field!






 I consent to receiving periodic email communications from StemCells, Inc.. 
            

 I'd like to receive more information from PrecisionIR.
            







Watch

Watch this company to be notified of upcoming earnings calls and new content with a weekly digest sent to your email.
            
 Watch content
            




Go!
Cancel






Company Spotlight is available free to investors through the financial support of participating companies. In return for receiving this free information, your contact data are made available to the companies whose reports you have ordered, and to other parties as described in our privacy policy, which you can read in its entirety here. In addition, you agree to be contacted by these companies from time to time. You may select at any time to opt out of these communications by using the unsubscribe link in your email(s) or by sending an email to nacustomerservice@precisionir.com.



×
 Enter your email address to watch this company.




E-mail (required):


required field!



First Name:





Last Name:












    Signup 




×
  Enter your email address and notification preferences.




A reminder has been added for this event.



    Add to Calendar
  


Add to Google Calendar


Add to Live Calendar


Add to Yahoo! Calendar


Add to iCalender


Add to Outlook Calendar







Or





Send me a reminder




Weeks

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52



Days

0
1
2
3
4
5
6



Hours

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23



Minutes

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52
53
54
55
56
57
58
59





before the event.

Please enter a valid email to watch!

First Name

Last Name








    Signup 

















StemCells, Inc. Expands SC Proven(R) Product Portfolio With Launch Of Proprietary Human Cell Detection Antibodies - Pg.2 - TheStreet




























































 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 








































StemCells, Inc. Expands SC Proven(R) Product Portfolio With Launch Of Proprietary Human Cell Detection Antibodies






GlobeNewswire



Dec 6, 2010 9:00 AM EST













 


















































  About SC Proven Products    The SC Proven product portfolio comprises a range of specialty cell culture products that enable the standardized and reproducible production and propagation of highly purified stem cells and their differentiated progeny, as well as reagents for cell detection, isolation and characterization. The entire SC Proven product catalog and online ordering can be found at   www.scproven.com .   References   Kelly S, et al. Transplanted human fetal neural stem cells survive, migrate, and differentiate in ischemic rat cerebral cortex. PNAS (2004) 101:11839-11844  Cummings B.J.,  et al. Human neural stem cells differentiate and promote locomotor recovery in spinal cord-injured mice.  PNAS (2005) 102: 14069-14074  Tamaki S.J., et al., Neuroprotection of Host Cells by Human Central Nervous System Stem Cells in a Mouse Model of Infantile Neuronal Ceroid Lipofuscinosis. Cell Stem Cell (2009) 5:310-319  Kallur T., et al. Human Fetal Cortical and Striatal Neural Stem Cells Generate Region-Specific Neurons In Vitro and Differentiate Extensively to Neurons After Intrastriatal Transplantation in Neonatal Rats. J Neurosci Res. (2006) 84:1630-1644  Salazar D.L., et al., Human Neural Stem Cells Differentiate and Promote Locomotor Recovery in an Early Chronic Spinal Cord Injury NOD- scid Mouse Model. PLoS ONE (2010) 5: e12272   About StemCells, Inc.   StemCells, Inc. is engaged in the research, development, and commercialization of cell-based therapeutics and tools for use in stem cell-based research and drug discovery. In its therapeutic product development programs, StemCells is targeting disorders of the central nervous system and the liver. StemCells' lead product candidate, HuCNS-SC ® cells (purified human neural stem cells), is currently in clinical development for the treatment of two fatal neurodegenerative disorders in children, and in preclinical development for spinal cord injury and retinal disorders such as age-related macular degeneration. StemCells also markets research products, including media and reagents, under the SC Proven ®brand, and is developing stem cell-based assay platforms for use in pharmaceutical research, drug discovery and drug development. Further information about StemCells is available at   www.stemcellsinc.com .  The StemCells, Inc. logo is available at http://www.globenewswire.com/newsroom/prs/?pkgid=7014  Apart from statements of historical fact, the text of this press release constitutes forward-looking statements within the meaning of the U.S. securities laws, and is subject to the safe harbors created therein. These statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the ability of STEM101, STEM121 and STEM123 to enable and improve the visualization, detection, tracking and characterization of human cells both in vitro and when transplanted into animal models of human diseases; the clinical development of the Company's HuCNS-SC cells; the prospects for the Company to pursue non-therapeutic applications of its cell-based technologies; and the future business operations of the Company. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this news release. The Company does not undertake to update any of these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances that occur after the date hereof. Such statements reflect management's current views and are based on certain assumptions that may or may not ultimately prove valid. The Company's actual results may vary materially from those contemplated in such forward-looking statements due to risks and uncertainties to which the Company is subject, including those described under the heading "Risk Factors" in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009, and in its subsequent reports on Form 10-Q and Form 8-K. CONTACT: StemCells, Inc.         Investor Inquiries         Megan Meloni         (650) 475-3105                  Russo Partners         Media         Ian Stone           (619) 528-2220         David Schull           (212) 845-4271       



 








 































































 











Trending


Amazon and General Electric Are Friday's Smoking Hot Tickers: AMZN, TSLA, SBUX, GE, AAPL, X


Starbucks Shares Are Crashing; Go Out and Buy!


U.S. Steel Shares Are Being Torched, Thanks to One Stock Analyst


Jim Cramer Nails Starbucks' Big Decline, Warns Again of Downside to $50


Apple Investing Billions in OLED Display











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













StemCells, Inc. Adds Serum-Free and Animal Component-Free Cell Culture Supplements to Its SC Proven(R) Product Portfolio Nasdaq:STEM









































































English
Français











Register
Sign In













StemCells, Inc. Adds Serum-Free and Animal Component-Free Cell Culture Supplements to Its SC Proven(R) Product Portfolio




















March 29, 2011 09:00 ET

 | Source: StemCells, Inc.





PALO ALTO, Calif., March 29, 2011 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- StemCells, Inc. (Nasdaq:STEM) announced today the launch of three new cell culture supplements for the derivation, culture and differentiation of human and mouse embryonic stem (ES) cells, induced pluripotent stem (iPS) cells, and tissue-derived neural stem (NS) cells.1-13 The research community demands reliable and cost-effective options for the reagents they routinely use to capture, define and instruct stem cell behavior. These new supplements satisfy this demand by providing researchers with additional choices to use either a defined, serum-free, or a defined, serum-free and animal component-free (AF) version of culture supplements that are considered to be fundamental reagents for stem cell research.

	"We are pleased to continue growing and diversifying our SC Proven® reagents business to meet the needs of the burgeoning stem cell research market," said Stewart Craig, Ph.D., Senior Vice President, Development and Operations at StemCells, Inc.  "In 2010, SC Proven product sales revenue grew by approximately 30%, and we are continuing to experience double digit growth this year. 

	 "Our expanding line of SC Proven cell culture supplements provides researchers with well-defined reagents that are free of the serum and animal protein-derived contaminants that can cause variability of performance and impair analyses, particularly in the context of stem cell-based drug screens," continued Dr. Craig. "Furthermore, the use of animal component-free formulations is an important consideration for researchers considering bench-to-bedside applications in which human stem cell lines may be derived, expanded and banked for potential future translation into clinical trials."

	NDiff® N2-AF is a proprietary, defined, serum-free and animal component-free version of the Company's NDiff N2 product, a proprietary, defined, serum-free cell culture supplement based on the original Bottenstein formulation.1

	NDiff N27 is a proprietary, defined, serum-free cell culture supplement based on the original Brewer formulation.2

	NDiff N27-AF is a proprietary, defined, serum-free and animal component-free version of NDiff N27.

About SC Proven Products 

	The SC Proven product portfolio comprises a range of products for the detection, isolation, expansion, differentiation, and characterization of a variety of different human and animal cell types. The entire SC Proven product catalog and online ordering can be found at www.scproven.com. 

References


		Bottenstein JE, Cell Culture in the Neurosciences, (1985) Plenum Press: New York and London.

		Brewer G, et al., Optimized Survival of Hippocampal Neurons in B27-Supplemented Neurobasal™, a New Serum-free Medium Combination. J. Neurosci. Res. (1993) 35:567–576.

		Ying QL, Smith AG, Defined conditions for neural commitment and differentiation. Methods Enzymol. (2008) 365:327-341.

		Ying QL, et al., Conversion of embryonic stem cells into neuroectodermal precursors in adherent monoculture. Nature Biotechnology (2003) 21:183-186.

		Conti L, et al., Niche-independent symmetrical self-renewal of a mammalian tissue stem cell. PLoS Biol. (2005) 3(9):e283.

		Pollard SM, et al., Adherent neural stem (NS) cells from fetal and adult forebrain. Cereb. Cortex (2006) 16 Suppl 1:112-20.

		Conti L, et al., Neural stem cell systems: diversities and properties after transplantation in animal models of diseases. Brain Pathol. (2006) 16(2):143-154.

		Nichols J, Ying QL, Derivation and propagation of embryonic stem cells in serum- and feeder-free culture. Methods Mol Biol. (2006) 329:91-98.

		Liu Y, et al., A novel chemical-defined medium with bFGF and N2B27 supplements supports undifferentiated growth in human embryonic stem cells. BBRC (2006)346:131-139

		Yao S, et al., Long-term self-renewal and directed differentiation of human embryonic stem cells in chemically defined conditions. PNAS (2006) 103(18):6907–6912.

		Hanna J, et al., Human embryonic stem cells with biological and epigenetic characteristics similar to those of mouse ES cells. PNAS (2010) 107(20):9222-7.

		Yu J, et al., Efficient Feeder-Free Episomal Reprogramming with Small Molecules. PLoS ONE (2011) 6 (3):e17557.

		Tsutsui H, et al., An optimized small molecule inhibitor cocktail supports long-term maintenance of human embryonic stem cells. Nat Commun. (2011) 2:167.


About StemCells, Inc.

	StemCells, Inc. is engaged in the research, development, and commercialization of cell-based therapeutics and tools for use in stem cell-based research and drug discovery. In its therapeutic product development programs, StemCells is targeting disorders of the central nervous system and the liver. StemCells' lead product candidate, HuCNS-SC® cells (purified human neural stem cells), is currently in clinical development for spinal cord injury and two fatal neurodegenerative disorders in children, and in preclinical development for retinal disorders such as age-related macular degeneration. StemCells also markets stem cell research products, including media and reagents, under the SC Proven® brand, and is developing stem cell-based assay platforms for use in pharmaceutical research, drug discovery and drug development. Further information about StemCells is available at www.stemcellsinc.com.

	The StemCells, Inc. logo is available at http://www.globenewswire.com/newsroom/prs/?pkgid=7014

Apart from statements of historical fact, the text of this press release constitutes forward-looking statements within the meaning of the U.S. securities laws, and is subject to the safe harbors created therein. These statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding the prospect of continued growth of the Company's SC Proven reagents business; the potential regulatory acceptability of cell culture supplements used to derive cells for human research; clinical development of the Company's HuCNS-SC cells; the prospects for the Company to pursue non-therapeutic applications of its cell-based technologies; and the future business operations of the Company. These forward-looking statements speak only as of the date of this news release. The Company does not undertake to update any of these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances that occur after the date hereof. Such statements reflect management's current views and are based on certain assumptions that may or may not ultimately prove valid. The Company's actual results may vary materially from those contemplated in such forward-looking statements due to risks and uncertainties to which the Company is subject, including those described under the heading "Risk Factors" in the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2010, and in its subsequent reports on Form 8-K.
Megan Meloni
Media Relations & Corporate Communications
(650) 475-3105



Related Articles
other press releases by StemCells, Inc.


StemCells, Inc. Encourages Stockholders to Return Proxies Approving the Microbot Merger by November 14, 2016
October 27, 2016 16:31


StemCells, Inc. and Microbot Medical Ltd. Announce Strategic Merger
August 16, 2016 09:14


StemCells, Inc. Announces Termination of Phase II Pathway Study Following Review of Data
May 31, 2016 08:15


StemCells, Inc. to Report 12-Month Cohort I Data from its Phase II Pathway Study 
May 10, 2016 10:00


StemCells, Inc. Announces 1-for-12 Reverse Stock Split
May 06, 2016 12:49






447



other news releases in

Product / Services Announcement

in the last 30 days
                            






236



other news releases in

Health

in the last 30 days
                            











Profile

StemCells, Inc.





  Subscribe via RSS
 Subscribe via ATOM
 Javascript



  newark, California, UNITED STATES




Contact Data
Megan Meloni
Media Relations & Corporate Communications
(650) 475-3105







Media Files



StemCells, Inc.  Logo






LOGO URL | Copy the link below
            





Formats available:






                            Original
                        




                            Medium
                        




                            Small
                        








Tags
BIOTECHNOLOGY
MEDICAL
PRODUCT














Newswire Distribution Network & Management



Home
Newsroom
RSS Feeds
Legal
Contact Us






About Us
GlobeNewswire, a Nasdaq company, is one of the world's largest newswire distribution networks, specializing in the delivery of corporate press releases financial disclosures and multimedia content to the media, investment community, individual investors and the general public.
            




Contact Us


Corporate Headquarters
2321 Rosecrans Avenue.
Suite 2200
El Segundo, CA 90245
Phone: (800) 307-6627
Fax:  (800) 307-3567
            


European Headquarters
Woolgate Exchange,
25 Basinghall Street,
London EC2V 5HA
UK
Phone: +1 866-465-8454




© 2017 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All Rights Reserved.





























Surgenex® Creates The Most Innovative Amniotic Membrane Products

























































Safe & Effective  
Cryopreserved Amniotic Membrane Injections
Call Now 1.877.880.1862





























Injectable Amniotic Membrane


See the most commonly asked questions about SurForce® 

Read More












Download Product Brochure SurForce®
CRYOPRESERVED AMNIOTIC MEMBRANE ALLOGRAFT Injections
Amniotic membrane has been successfully used in treatments for decades.


Download Now!







About Us
SURGENEX® DELIVERS THE MOST INNOVATIVE AMNIOTIC MEMBRANE PRODUCTS IN REGENERATIVE MEDICINE



Our Mission
Turning Innovative Science into Value for Patients 
Surgenex® is committed to turning innovative science into medical solutions that bring value and hope to patients worldwide. Every day, we work together to address unmet medical needs with a focus on soft tissue damage, wounds, burns, osteoarthritis, rheumatoid arthritis, tendinitis and plantar fasciitis therapeutic areas, and leveraging new research technologies with amniotic membrane allograft treatment. We remain dedicated to meeting patient’s needs, and support for them will never waver.
                       At Surgenex®, we’re focused on making changing tomorrow a reality. Click here to learn more about Surgenex® mission statment 


SURGENEX® Capability
SURGENEX® is the producer and distributor of the highest quality amniotic membrane tissue allograft in the industry. Amniotic Tissue is used for a wide variety of clinical applications including: 



 Orthopedics
 Sports Medicine
 Wound Care




 Podiatry
 Pain Management



SURGENEX® has developed innovative processes and safety protocols, which deliver the highest cellular tissue viability and safety standards. With these safety and quality standards, SURGENEX® will become the leader of amniotic membrane tissue allografts in the field of regenerative medicine.
The SURGENEX® proprietary Excellion® process preserves the integrity of the amnion tissue, achieving greater clinical outcomes. This unique process yields high concentrations of tissue, growth factors, anti-inflammatory cytokines, and is chorion free. Our products contain these extracellular proteins and molecules which induce soft tissue healing, reduce scar tissue, and promote tissue regeneration.
Our placenta recovery processes start where life begins. Qualified mothers donate their placenta for medical treatments and research. These donors are selected through a strict screening process which includes an extensive patient questionnaire, serological testing, and a medical staff interview to ensure donor eligibility. The Excellion® process honors these donations by meticulously collecting the amniotic membrane and carefully removing unwanted tissues such as the chorion. This highly technical process produces the highest cellular tissue viability and the best amniotic tissue allograft in the industry.







We Deliver Results
Our Company has developed innovative processes and safety protocols, which deliver the highest cellular viability and safety standards.  With these safety and quality standards, SURGENEX® is poised to become the leader of amniotic membrane allografts in the field of regenerative medicine.







Our products
SurForce® Amniotic Tissue Allograft 



Product SurForce® Goto SurForce Website 
SurForce® is a minimally manipulated, morselized flowable amniotic membrane tissue allograft designed to be the best product on the market today. It is an injectable allograft for homologous use only that allows the physician freedom to make precise applications. 
SurForce® is thoroughly tested for safety in clinical procedures. Our donor serology test panel is the most extensive in the industry, testing for several potential pathogens that could be missed by less extensive testing observed in competitive industry products. SURGENEX® conducts two simultaneous 14-day bacterial/fungal tests performed by one internal and one third party lab, to confirm our products are free of bacterial and fungal contaminants. These two safety barriers verify that SurForce® is the cleanest and safest amniotic membrane tissue allograft product on the market.







ITEM NUMBER
105011001200








AVAILABLE SIZES
1/2 CC1 CC2 CC





Call Now 1.877.880.1862









CONTRAINDICATIONS
SurForce® should not be injected into the spinal canal, in vital organs (including the heart and other areas of the central nervous system), nor the circulatory system. This product is not intended to be used as a bone substitute. SurForce® should not be injected in active infections nor patients that have conditions that would cause substantial risk of using this product. SurForce® has not been tested in combination with other products.










RECOMMENDED INSTRUCTIONS FOR SurForce®
The following are suggested recommendations as a guide and are not intended to supersede the professional and clinical judgment of the treating physician concerning patient care.







PREPARATION INSTRUCTIONS
Open the sterile pouch containing the vial and transfer onto a sterile working area. Allow to thaw completely (approximately 30 minutes). Once completely thawed, aspirate SurForce® using a 16g or 18g needle and syringe. Inject the allograft in the patient using a 22g needle or larger size needle.







CONTENTS AND DESCRIPTION
SurForce® is a cryopreserved flowable allograft tissue matrix available in a variety of vial sizes. Each vial is visually inspected and carefully tested for quality assurance before delivery. If you received an open or broken vial, do not use it. Immediately contact SURGENEX®, LLC customer service. SurForce® is intended to be used on a single patient, as a one-time use only. Once SurForce® is properly thawed, it must be used immediately or promptly discarded.
SurForce® has been tested for relevant communicable diseases in accordance with the required FDA standards for tissue donation. SURGENEX®, LLC may test beyond this FDA minimum for additional pathogens at its discretion in order to ensure patient safety. Additionally, before delivery, the product is tested using a bacterial and fungal culture as an added precaution.







NOTICE
Federal law requires HCT/P to be sold by or on the order of a licensed physician. Any violation will be subject to Federal law. The HCT/P is intended for homologous use only, as reflected by the labeling, advertising, or other indications of the manufacturer's objective intent
Following use, dispose of any unused product and packaging following current accepted medical practices and follow all relevant local, state and federal laws and regulations.







DONOR ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS
An allograft of donated human tissue is deemed qualified for transplantation by an authorized recovery agency by meeting the following criteria:
Results from the donor pre-screening lab tests specify the donor to be free from risk factors and active infections of applicable communicable disease agents and diseases as required by the FDA.
Donor results from the pre-screening lab tests must be negative and/or non-reactive for the following applicable communicable disease agents.





Prescreening
HIV I/II ABHIV/HCV/HBV NATHBC ABHBS AGRPRHCV ABHTLV I/II









DONOR SELECTION PROCESS
Under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (CLIA) and 42 CFR part 493, all contracted laboratories performing human specimen tests are certified and meet the requirements as determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS).
All donor recoveries meet and adhere to the regulations requisite to HCT/P recovery and the screening and testing of the tissue donor as verified through the tests noted in the section of pre-screening lab tests above.
Utilizing the U.S. Public Health Service guidelines, the donor’s relevant medical history and behavioral risk assessments are obtained preceding donation.
The qualified recovery agency evaluates the results of the blood sample tests, the relevant medical history, and the examinations pertaining to donor tissue eligibility. Discussions with either physicians or the donor mother are performed to identify situations that may disqualify the donor.
These results conclude that the donor suitability criteria meet the standard requirements for transplantation. Specific and detailed information of the testing laboratories, required infectious disease tests results, listings of documents reviewed as part of the pertinent medical records, and all necessary donor medical information of any specific allograft tissue recovered via SURGENEX®, LLC is stored in our facilities and/or affiliated facilities.







STORAGE REQUIREMENTS
It is the responsibility of the clinician to store SurForce® in its original packaging until ready for use. SurForce® can be maintained at -18°C or colder for three months or until expiration date printed on product packaging, whichever comes first. Recommended long-term storage is at – 80°C using an ultra-low temperature freezer or liquid nitrogen until the expiration date printed on the sterile pouch is reached.
Following use, dispose of any unused product and packaging following current accepted medical practices and follow all relevant local, state and federal laws and regulations.







HCT/P TRACKING
The Joint Commission and FDA requires patient records to be properly maintained by storing the allograft ID number (LOT NUMBER) for purposes of tracking the allograft post treatment. Please go to our website www.surgenex.com/records and register by using the lot number provided on the silver pouch.







RETURN POLICY
SURGENEX®, LLC accepts no returns of SurForce®. Although SURGENEX®, LLC has taken great measures to ensure the safety of our allograft product, current technologies cannot preclude the transmission of certain diseases known or unknown, therefore, SURGENEX®, LLC can make no claims concerning the biological properties and safety of allograft tissue. All tissues have been collected, processed, screened, tested, stored, and distributed in compliance with all current FDA regulations concerning HCT/Ps.
Application and use of any allograft tissue may potentially have negative outcomes. Occurrence of complications at the affected site may transpire post-treatment without early warning signs. These include, but are not limited to 1) transmission of communicable diseases, 2) transmission of infectious disease agents such as: bacteria and fungus, viruses; and 3) immune rejection of, and/or allergic reaction to, injected HCT/P.







PRECAUTIONS
Caution should be taken when administering this product to immunocompromised individuals, such as patients suffering from HIV or other highly immunocompromised conditions.
DMSO is used as a cryoprotectant. Therefore, SurForce® should not be used by patients with known sensitivities or allergies to DMSO.
SURGENEX®, LLC and its affiliates furnish this allograft product without any express or implied warranties. All statements or descriptions are informational only and are not to be interpreted or implied as a warranty of the allograft product. SURGENEX®, LLC and its affiliates make no guarantee regarding the biological characteristics of this product. The end user shall be held responsible for determining the appropriate application and usage of this product.








Committed To The Highest International Standards
SURGENEX® is the producer and distributor of the highest quality of amniotic membrane tissue allograft in the industry.







Manufacturing
SURGENEX® uses a patent pending process to produce its minimally manipulated product which conforms to the regulations and the FDA’s definition found in HTC/P 361 products in accordance with FDA Article 21 CFR Part 1271. Following these standards allows SURGENEX®  to sell approved allograft products with  confidence to Healthcare Providers. 



DONOR PROCEDURES/FDA TESTING
SURGENEX® allograft products produced from donated human tissue is deemed qualified for transplantation by an authorized recovery agency by meeting the following criteria:
Results from the donor pre-screening lab tests specify the donor to be free from risk factors and active infections of applicable communicable disease agents and diseases as required by the FDA.
Donor results from the pre-screening lab tests for the following applicable communicable disease agents are negative and/or non-reactive for the following:







Prescreening Lab Testing
HIV I/II AbHIV/HCV/HBV NATHBc AbHBs Ag









COMPLIANCE & QUALITY ASSURANCE
Under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (CLIA) and 42 CFR part 493, all contracted laboratories performing human specimen tests are certified and meet the requirements as determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS).
All donor recoveries meet and adhere to the regulations requisite to HCT/P recovery and the screening and testing of the tissue donor as verified through the tests noted in the section of pre-screening lab testing above.
Utilizing the U.S. Public Health Service guidelines, the donor’s relevant medical history and behavioral risk assessments are obtained preceding donation. The qualified recovery agency evaluates the results of the blood sample tests, the relevant medical history, and the examinations pertaining to donor tissue eligibility. Discussions with either physicians or the donor mother are preformed to identify situations that may disqualify the donor. These results conclude that the donor suitability criteria meet the standard requirements for transplantation. Specific and detailed information of the testing laboratories, required infectious disease tests results, listings of documents reviewed as part of the pertinent medical records, and all necessary donor medical information of any specific allograft tissue recovered via SURGENEX®, LLC is stored in our facilities and/or affiliated facilities.
SURGENEX® and its affiliates are current in the FDA Establishment Registration and Listing of Human Cells, Tissues and Cellular and Tissue-Based Products (HCT/P) as required by the Federal Drug Administration. We hold ourselves to a higher standard to perform above and beyond the minimum requirements in the industry, ensuring best practices and superior product outcomes.








 


Research
Current research in amniotic membrane allografts  is shaping the future of healthcare. 



Amniotic Membrane Research
Amniotic membrane allograft tissue has been an accepted method of treatment since the early 1900s. The healthcare community has benefited from the tissue regeneration outcomes in specialties such as surgery, orthopedics, pain management, burn care, eye, as well as dental. More recently, Podiatric Physicians have been effectively applying these allografts to patients with diabetic foot ulcers. These treatments are yielding paradigm-shifting outcomes for their patients.
Amniotic membrane tissue injections have been growing in popularity over the past few decades Research and development have increased opportunities and discovered a variety of ground-breaking applications. 
Utilizing the latest research and implementing efficient operations, SURGENEX® will focus on innovative research-proven products.

Explore the research and articles below involving the use of amniotic allograft tissue and how it plays an impactful role in the future of regenerative medicine.







Industry Spotlight:
Comparison of Cryopreserved Amniotic Membrane and Umbilical Cord Tissue with Dehydrated Amniotic Membrane/chorion Tissue
Growth Factors and Components:
Amniotic Fluid and Placental Stem Cells
Growth Factor mRNA and Protein in Preserved Human Amniotic Membrane 
Applications of Amniotic Membrane and Fluid in Stem Cell Biology and Regenerative Medicine
Collagen Types in Normal and Prematurely Ruptured Amniotic Membranes
Anti-fibrosis Functions:
Soluble Factors of Amnion-derived Cells in Treatment of Inflammatory and Fibrotic Pathologies
Human Amnion-derived Stem Cells Have Immunosuppressive Properties on NK Cells and Monocytes
Anti-microbial Properties:
Antibacterial Properties of Human Amnion and Chorion in Vitro
Amniotic Fluid: Not Just Fetal Urine Anymore
Immune Evasive and Immune Privileged Properties:
Amniotic Membrane-derived Stem Cells: Immunomodulatory Properties and Potential Clinical Application
Immunogenicity of Human Amniotic Epithelial Cells After Transplantation into Volunteers
Amnion-derived Multipotent Progenitor Cells Support Allograft Tolerance Induction
Comparison of Angiogenic, Cytoprotective, and Immunosuppressive Properties of Human Amnion and Chorion-derived Mesenchymal Stem Cells
Pain Management and Anti-inflammatory Properties:
Suppression of inflammatory and fibrotic responses in allergic inflammation by the amniotic membrane stromal matrix
Amniotic Membrane and Amniotic Cells: Potential Therapeutic Tools to Combat Tissue Inflammation and Fibrosis
Identification of Antiangiogenic and Anti-inflammatory Proteins in Human Amniotic Membrane
Joints and Cartilage:
Potential Use of the Human Amniotic Membrane as a Scaffold in Human Articular Cartilage Repair











New Patients Process
If you have addational questions or need help finding a doctor go to our SurForce Website






1


Find a Doctor





2


Contact Your Doctor





3


Consult with Doctor





4


Treatment





5


Recovery













Contact Us

SURGENEX® LLC
                                PO Box 4664
                                Scottsdale, AZ 85261
Corporate: 877.880.1862
Sales: 877.880.1862 ext 1
                            






Get Started Now!
* indicates required

First Name  *




Last Name  *




Email Address  *




Company Website 



Phone Number  *




Reason for Contact  *



Sales Inquiry
Clinical / Medical Questions
Distribution



Select One  *

M.D. / D.O.
Nurse Practitioner
Chiropractor
Naturopathic Doctor
Distributor





 

































STEMCELL Technologies



















 













JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                









Stemcell Technologies







 





Have a question? 1 800 667 0322  or Email Us
 
My Account
My Cart
Checkout
My Account












Stemcell Technologies

 Menu
0




 
					My Cart				
 

					0				





 
 You have no items in your shopping cart.
Add some to cart or login































Tools to Isolate, Culture and Assay Cells.
 










Search
 





















Featured Products and Resources




            Microsite        







                Microsite            

            Immunology Profiles        

           Get to Know the Immunologists Behind the Papers You Read        

                View Profiles            







            Training Course        







                Training Course            

            Culture and Differentiate hPSCs        

           Guest Lecture by Dr. Mummery: Studying Cardiovascular Disease Using hPSCs        

                Learn More            







            Webinar        







                Webinar            

            Dr. Vincenzo Macri and Dr. Stacie Chvatal        

           Modeling Arrhythmias Using hPSC-Derived Cardiomyocytes and Tracking Their Excitability        

                Register Now            







            Featured Product        







                Featured Product            

            STEMdiff™ Cerebral Organoid Kit        

           Recapitulate Human Brain Development In Vitro        

                See the Data            




 






 

Chat with an Expert











Products




















 














JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                









Stemcell Technologies







 





Have a question? 1 800 667 0322  or Email Us
 
My Account
My Cart
Checkout
My Account













 Search









 








Stemcell Technologies

 Menu
0




 
					My Cart				
 

					0				





 
 You have no items in your shopping cart.
Add some to cart or login
























 







Products












Quick View
Test


Reversion of Primed hPSCs to Naive-Like State Training Course

                        Two-day hands-on training to support human pluripotent stem cell research                    









Quick View
Test


Standardization of the Hematopoietic Progenitor Assay Training Course

                        Two-day hands-on training on the CFU Assay for human cord blood and bone marrow samples                    









Quick View
Test


Human Bone Marrow Proficiency Testing Program

                        For the hematopoietic colony forming unit (CFU) assay                    









Quick View
Test


ALDEFLUOR™ Kit

                        For the identification, evaluation and isolation of stem and progenitor cells expressing high levels of ALDH                    









Quick View
Test


AggreWell™ Rinsing Solution

                        Rinsing solution for AggreWell™ plates                    









Quick View
Test


ReLeSR™

                        Enzyme-free human ES and iPS cell selection and passaging reagent                    









Quick View
Test


Vitronectin XF™

                        Defined, xeno-free cell attachment factor that supports the growth and differentiation of human pluripotent stem cells under serum-free, feeder-free conditions                    









Quick View
Test


Lymphoprep™

                        Density gradient medium for the isolation of mononuclear cells                    









Quick View
Test


EasySep™ Human CD4+ T Cell Isolation Kit

                        8-Minute cell isolation kit using immunomagnetic negative selection                    









Quick View
Test


RoboSep™-S

                        RoboSep™-S - The Fully Automated Cell Separator                    









Quick View
Test


EasySep™ Magnet

                        Magnet for column-free immunomagnetic separation                    









Quick View
Test


CryoStor® CS10

                        Animal component-free, defined cryopreservation medium with 10% DMSO                    
















Shop By



Narrow Results By

Shopping Options

Application


Activation											(6)



Antibiotic											(9)



Cell Culture											(234)



Cell Isolation											(330)



Characterization											(4)



Chromatin Immunoprecipitation (ChIP)											(1)



Colony Assay											(66)



Cryopreservation											(11)



CyTOF											(30)



Depletion											(5)



Differentiation											(152)



ELISA											(34)



ELISpot											(2)



Electron Microscopy											(3)



Expansion											(81)



Flow Cytometry											(141)



Functional Assay											(110)



Hybridoma Generation											(10)



Immunoblotting											(7)



Immunocytochemistry											(81)



Immunofluorescence											(93)



Immunohistochemistry											(98)



Immunoprecipitation											(73)



In Vitro Diagnostic											(11)



Maintenance											(72)



Neutralization and Blocking											(10)



Organoid Culture											(5)



Phenotyping											(2)



Reprogramming											(50)



Semi-Solid Cloning											(8)



Spheroid Culture											(14)



Toxicity Assay											(10)



Western Blotting											(59)




Area of Interest


Angiogenic Cell Research											(12)



Antibody Development											(19)



Cancer Research											(164)



Cell Line Development											(25)



Chimerism											(55)



Cord Blood Banking											(12)



Disease Modeling											(65)



Drug Discovery and Toxicity Testing											(58)



Endothelial Cell Biology											(27)



Epithelial Cell Biology											(124)



HLA											(48)



Hybridoma Generation											(26)



Immunology											(531)



Infectious Diseases											(4)



Metabolism											(7)



Mitosis											(1)



Neuroscience											(187)



Respiratory Research											(2)



Stem Cell Biology											(567)



T Cell Engineering											(12)



Transplantation Research											(29)




Brand


ALDEFLUOR											(2)



AggreWell											(5)



BloodStor											(2)



BrainPhys											(2)



CellAdhere											(7)



ClonaCell											(17)



CloneR											(1)



CryoStor											(3)



ES-Cult											(1)



EasySep											(219)



EpiCult											(3)



ErythroClear											(1)



HemaTox											(3)



HetaSep											(1)



Hypothermosol											(1)



ImmunoCult											(8)



IntestiCult											(2)



Lymphoprep											(1)



MammoCult											(1)



MegaCult											(7)



MesenCult											(20)



MethoCult											(29)



MyeloCult											(2)



MyoCult											(2)



NeuroCult											(18)



NeuroFluor											(2)



OptiPrep											(1)



PneumaCult											(3)



ProstaCult											(1)



RSeT											(1)



ReLeSR											(1)



RoboSep											(169)



RosetteSep											(40)



STEMdiff											(25)



STEMvision											(1)



SepMate											(2)



SmartDish											(2)



SpinSep											(1)



StemSep											(10)



StemSpan											(15)



TeSR											(16)



mFreSR											(2)




Cell and Tissue Source


Bone Marrow											(7)



Cord Blood											(10)



Other											(6)



Peripheral Blood											(24)



Pluripotent Stem Cells											(8)




Cell Type


Adipocytes											(20)



Airway Cells											(33)



Angiogenic Cells											(9)



Astrocytes											(6)



B Cells											(159)



Brain Tumor Stem Cells											(21)



CHO Cells											(14)



Cancer Cells and Cell Lines											(124)



Cardiac Cells											(32)



Cardiomyocytes, PSC-Derived											(7)



Chondrocytes											(6)



Dendritic Cells											(96)



Dermal Cells											(2)



Dopaminergic Neurons											(4)



Endoderm, PSC-Derived											(43)



Endothelial Cells											(33)



Endothelial Colony Forming Cells (ECFCs)											(4)



Epithelial Cells											(9)



Erythroid Cells											(10)



Granulocytes and Subsets											(89)



HEK-293											(4)



HUVECs											(4)



Hematopoietic Stem and Progenitor Cells											(262)



Hepatocytes											(16)



Hybridomas											(28)



Innate Lymphoid Cells											(5)



Intestinal Cells											(30)



Keratinocytes											(10)



Leukemia/Lymphoma Cells											(25)



Leuko Paks											(1)



Lymphocytes											(31)



Macrophages											(59)



Mammary Cells											(57)



Marrow Stromal Cells											(33)



Megakaryocytes											(5)



Mesenchymal Cells, PSC-Derived											(11)



Mesenchymal Stem and Progenitor Cells											(138)



Mesenchymal Stromal Cells											(1)



Mesoderm, PSC-Derived											(38)



Monocytes											(121)



Mononuclear Cells											(41)



Mouse Embryonic Fibroblasts											(12)



Myeloid Cells											(93)



Myeloma											(2)



Myogenic Stem and Progenitor Cells											(13)



NK Cells											(92)



Neural Cells, PSC-Derived											(89)



Neural Stem and Progenitor Cells											(118)



Neurons											(107)



Osteoblasts											(28)



Other											(121)



Pancreatic Cells											(20)



Plasma Cells											(45)



Platelets											(5)



Pluripotent Stem Cells											(231)



Prostate Cells											(29)



Red Blood Cells											(8)



Renal Cells											(1)



T Cells											(236)



T Cells, CD4+											(80)



T Cells, CD8+											(51)



T Cells, Other Subsets											(15)



T Cells, Regulatory											(25)



Total Lymphocytes											(4)



Tumor Cells											(1)



Whole											(3)




Conjugation


AMCA											(1)



APC											(78)



Alexa Fluor 488											(61)



Biotin											(70)



FITC											(88)



PE											(95)



PE-Cyanine7											(1)



Pacific Blue											(10)



PerCP											(1)



PerCP-Cyanine5.5											(29)



Unconjugated											(128)




Donor Status


Diseased											(1)



Normal											(52)




Formulation


Animal Component-Free											(25)



Chemically Defined											(3)



Defined											(94)



Methylcellulose-Based											(2)



Protein-Free											(3)



Serum-Free											(108)



Xeno-Free											(10)




Host Species


Goat											(4)



Hamster											(6)



Mouse											(97)



Rabbit											(9)



Rat											(36)




Pathway


AHR											(3)



AMPK											(5)



Activin/Nodal/TGFβ											(10)



Adenosine											(2)



Aurora Kinase											(2)



BMP											(2)



CSF-1											(1)



Calcium Signaling											(2)



Cyclin/CDK											(2)



DYRK											(1)



Epigenetic											(25)



Estrogen											(2)



FAK											(1)



Glucocorticoid											(1)



HGF											(2)



HIF-1											(1)



Hedgehog											(7)



Innate Immunity											(1)



Integrin											(1)



JAK/STAT											(7)



JNK											(1)



L-type Calcium Channel											(1)



MEK/ERK											(12)



Mitochondrial Respiratory Chain Complex											(1)



NF-κB											(9)



Notch											(4)



Oleic Acid											(1)



PI3K/AKT											(9)



PKA											(1)



PKC											(4)



PLK											(1)



PPARγ											(1)



Prostanoid											(3)



RHO/ROCK											(5)



Retinoid											(7)



SCF/KIT											(1)



Tyrosine Kinase											(14)



Ubiquitin											(1)



Vitamin D											(1)



WNT											(14)



cAMP											(5)



mTOR											(6)



p38 MAPK											(4)



p53											(3)




Product Type


Antibodies											(152)



Buffers and Solutions											(14)



Cell Culture Media and Supplements											(194)



Cell Dyes and Detection Assay Kits											(17)



Cell Isolation Products											(253)



Cell Storage Media											(10)



Cultureware and General Supplies											(50)



Cytokines											(160)



Density Gradient Media											(5)



ELISAs											(32)



Instruments and Software											(6)



Laboratory Equipment											(11)



Matrices and Substrates											(18)



Primary and Cultured Cells											(58)



STEMwear											(76)



Small Molecules											(201)



Standardization Tools											(8)



Tissue and Cell Culture Dissociation Reagents											(36)



Training and Education											(14)




Reactive Species


African Green Monkey											(1)



Baboon											(15)



Capuchin Monkey											(7)



Cat											(6)



Chicken											(1)



Chimpanzee											(27)



Common Marmoset											(5)



Cotton-Topped Tamarin											(2)



Cow											(5)



Cynomolgus											(26)



Dog											(5)



Guinea Pig											(2)



Horse											(3)



Human											(93)



Macaque											(9)



Mouse											(61)



Nancy Ma's Night Monkey											(1)



Non-Human Primate											(3)



Owl Monkey											(1)



Pig											(10)



Rabbit											(8)



Rat											(18)



Rhesus											(31)



Sheep											(2)



Sooty Mangabey											(5)



Squirrel Monkey											(6)



Toad											(1)




Selection Method


Depletion											(16)



Negative											(124)



Positive											(118)




Species


Human											(961)



Mouse											(588)



Non-Human Primate											(410)



Other											(386)



Rat											(401)




Subtype


Antibody Pair Kits											(8)



Basal Media											(19)



Cell Isolation Kits											(251)



Centrifugation Tubes											(3)



Complete Kits											(21)



Density Gradient Media											(4)



ELISA Plates											(1)



ELISA Reagents											(2)



Enzymatic											(32)



Fresh											(4)



Frozen											(52)



Glassware											(1)



Isotype Controls											(11)



Non-Enzymatic											(4)



Plates											(21)



Primary Antibodies											(135)



Secondary Antibodies											(4)



Semi-Solid Media											(42)



Slides											(2)



Specialized Media											(141)



Strainers											(2)



Supplements											(39)



Syringes and Needles											(2)



Tips											(1)



Training Programs											(13)



Tubes											(5)




Target Antigen


Beta-Tubulin III											(3)



Biotin											(1)



CD10											(1)



CD105 (Endoglin)											(1)



CD117 (c-Kit)											(3)



CD11b											(2)



CD11c											(1)



CD123 (IL-3Rα)											(1)



CD138 (Syndecan-1)											(2)



CD14											(2)



CD150 (SLAM)											(1)



CD16											(1)



CD16/CD32											(1)



CD183 (CXCR3)											(1)



CD184 (CXCR4)											(1)



CD19											(3)



CD196 (CCR6)											(1)



CD2											(1)



CD20											(1)



CD22											(1)



CD235 (Glycophorin)											(1)



CD235ab (Glycophorin A/B)											(1)



CD24											(2)



CD25											(4)



CD267 (TACI)											(1)



CD27											(1)



CD298											(1)



CD3											(2)



CD32											(2)



CD326 (EpCAM)											(3)



CD33											(2)



CD34											(3)



CD36											(1)



CD38											(2)



CD3e											(1)



CD4											(4)



CD40											(1)



CD41											(1)



CD43											(2)



CD44											(1)



CD45											(3)



CD45.1											(1)



CD45.2											(1)



CD45R (B220)											(1)



CD45RO											(1)



CD48 (SLAMF2)											(1)



CD49b (Integrin α2)											(1)



CD49f (Integrin α6)											(1)



CD5											(2)



CD51 (Integrin αV)											(1)



CD54 (ICAM-1)											(1)



CD56 (NCAM)											(1)



CD62L (L-selectin)											(1)



CD66b											(1)



CD68											(1)



CD71 (Transferrin Receptor)											(1)



CD73											(1)



CD83											(1)



CD8a											(3)



CD90 (Thy-1)											(1)



CD90.2 (Thy-1.2)											(1)



CD90/CD90.1											(1)



Dextran											(1)



EPCR (CD201)											(1)



EPO											(2)



F4/80											(1)



GFAP (Glial Fibrillary Acidic Protein)											(2)



Gr-1 (Ly-6G/Ly-6C)											(1)



HLA-DR											(1)



IgG1 Isotype Control											(3)



IgG2a Isotype Control											(3)



IgG2b Isotype Control											(2)



IgG3 Isotype Control											(1)



IgM Isotype Control											(2)



Keratin 18											(1)



Ly-49A											(1)



Ly-6G											(1)



MUC1 (CD227)											(1)



NGF Receptor, p75NTR (CD271)											(1)



NK1.1 (CD161)											(1)



Nestin											(3)



OCT4 (OCT3)											(3)



Oligodendrocyte Marker O4											(1)



PAX6											(1)



PhosphoSHIP											(1)



R-Phycoerythrin (RPE)											(1)



Red Blood Cell											(2)



SHIP											(2)



SHIP2											(1)



SOX1											(1)



SSEA-1 (CD15)											(1)



SSEA-3											(1)



SSEA-4											(1)



SSEA-5											(1)



Sca1 (Ly-6A/E)											(1)



Sox-2											(1)



T Cell Receptor Gamma/Delta											(1)



TER119											(1)



TRA-1-60 (Podocalyxin)											(1)



TRA-1-81											(1)



TRA-2-49											(1)



TRA-2-54											(1)



Tyrosine Hydroxylase											(1)



Ym1											(1)



p63 (deltaN)											(1)




T-Shirt Topic


Cell Culture Media											(12)



Cell Separation											(7)



General											(22)



Lab Event											(19)



Quote											(16)
















 

Chat with an Expert











Product Types - Products




















 














JavaScript seems to be disabled in your browser.
                    You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.                









Stemcell Technologies







 





Have a question? 1 800 667 0322  or Email Us
 
My Account
My Cart
Checkout
My Account













 Search









 








Stemcell Technologies

 Menu
0




 
					My Cart				
 

					0				





 
 You have no items in your shopping cart.
Add some to cart or login
























 







Popular Product Types

























































                                Cell Culture Media and Supplements                            














                                Cell Isolation Products                            














                                Primary and Cultured Cells                            














                                Cell Storage Media                            














                                Cytokines                            














                                Instruments and Software                            














                                Matrices and Substrates                            














                                Small Molecules                            














                                Cultureware and General Supplies                            










All Product Types 





                        Antibodies                    





                        Buffers and Solutions                    





                        Cell Culture Media and Supplements                    





                        Cell Dyes and Detection Assay Kits                    





                        Cell Isolation Products                    





                        Cell Storage Media                    





                        Cultureware and General Supplies                    





                        Cytokines                    





                        Density Gradient Media                    





                        ELISAs                    





                        Instruments and Software                    





                        Laboratory Equipment                    





                        Matrices and Substrates                    





                        Primary and Cultured Cells                    





                        Small Molecules                    





                        Standardization Tools                    





                        STEMwear                    





                        Tissue and Cell Culture Dissociation Reagents                    





                        Training and Education                    











 

Chat with an Expert






















U.S. Stem Cell, Inc – The New Generation Company In The Regenerative Medicine/Cellular Therapy Industry














































































 












 





Building The New Generation of  Regenerative Medicine 
		

World leader in research and development of   stem cell and regenerative medicine treatments  for  patients with degenerative conditions.  


Learn More About Us








Pioneers in research and development 


We have pioneered new applications  for diseases    and developed more than 30 protocols. 


View Our Products 








We are the largest network of  physicians 
		

We provide accredited training programs  in regenerative medicine to physicians  throughout the world.  
		

Learn More 



 









Expanding regenerative medicine






Treatment for Patients
Implementing the most advanced stem cell research in clinic at our point-of-care facilities.


Learn More




Solutions for Veterinarians
Providing veterinarians extensive regenerative medicine solutions for their patients.


Learn More




Training for Physicians
Programs that train physicians to perform Adipose and Bone Marrow Derived Stem Cell protocols.


Learn More





Top Scientists
We work with some of the top innovators in the industry to perform research and develop treatments.







Tissue Banking
We have a registered FDA tissue bank and can expand and bank patient cells for future use.







Since 1999
We have treated over 4000 patients and have done many of the first ever indications in the world





Developing the future of medicine
We are focused on the discovery, development and commercialization of cell based therapeutics that prevent, treat or cure disease by repairing and replacing damaged or aged tissue, cells and organs and restoring their normal function. We believe that regenerative medicine / cellular therapeutics will play a large role in positively changing the natural history of diseases ultimately, we contend, lessening patient burdens as well as reducing the associated economic impact disease imposes upon modern society.


Learn More






Want to learn more about US Stem Cell, Inc?Send Us A Message









Why U.S. Stem Cell?





We have treated over 4000 patients
We have trained over 600 practitioners
We have spent more than $125 million in research and development
We do not utilize harmful drugs to isolate cells from peripheral blood.
We have worked with several countries to help develop and write the regulations for stem cell therapy
Our protocols are being utilized in 6 continents
We are the inventors and developers of our own therapies



View Our Products



The U.S. Stem Cell Vision
Regenerative medicine can improve the quality of patients’ lives, while reducing hospitalizations and healthcare costs. U.S. Stem Cell is and will continue to be recognized by physicians and patients as the world’s leader in providing innovative treatment and management of patients with severe degenerative conditions.


View Clinical Trials









Latest News




























































	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started













































Stemaid™ : Embryonic Stem-cells




































×
 


Loading…


Close


























What is Stem Cell Therapy?
A stem cell is an undifferentiated cell that has the potential to divide and differentiate into any of the 220 cell-types of the human body.

					 Stem Cell Therapy (SCT), is the utilization of these cells in order to assist the body in the healing and regeneration of its existing cells.
Depending on the conditions, stem cells can be delivered through the blood stream or directly to the organ that is in need of treatment. Within 30 minutes of their delivery, the body starts to repair its damaged organs and the healing process can be observed up to 10 days after the injection. Several injections might be needed depending on the severity of the conditions and the expected results.








Your Source for Embryonic Stem-Cells
Embryonic Stem Cells are the most regenerative cells tested to date surpassing that of umblical-cord and adult stem cells.
	                We offer embryonic stem-cells and unique protocols to doctors and clinics that wish to provide safe and effective stem cell therapies to their patients.




Whether an individual is facing major health conditions or simply wishes to stay young and healthy, our embryonic stem-cells protocols can be highly beneficial.
We are the only company in the world offering embryonic stem-cells that have been tested for purity and safety in accordance with international standards.
Our Embryonic Stem Cells are grown without animal feeder layers and thus do not present any contamination danger.
Embryonic stem cells are up to 6x more potent in their ability to help the human body heal itself than that of adult stem cells or umbilical stem cells. While autologous-embryonic stem cells are up to 10x more potent.


Comparitive Efficacy in %* Chart results are approximations based on preliminary studies







SAFE & EFFECTIVE






Embryonic Without The Ethical Concerns
Gone are the days when donated embryos were required to make embryonic stem cells. Stemaid™ utilizes an advanced process to reset a regular adult skin cell back to an embryonic state from which we derive our stem cell lines. In other words, potential-life plays no part in our production process.
	                We can even create a custom stem cell line from a patient's own skin sample. These are known as autologous embryonic stem cells. 










Pioneers in Embryonic Stem Cell Production
We were the first company in the world to produce embryonic stem cells for therapeutic use. With over a decade of experience, you can trust that our stem cells are safe and reliable.







2004


Company established and dedicated research begins.








2007


Clinical trials begin.








2010


Commencement of stem-cell distribution








2012


Commence production of skin-cell-derived embryonic stem-cells.


















Treatable Diseases
Below is a list of conditions which have proven responsive to Stem Cell Therapy. If your condition is not shown in this list, please inquire with our medical team. New applications are always under development and we will give you the latest updates for your condition.





Aging






Autism






Alzheimer's Disease






Brain Injury






Cerebral Palsy






Epilepsy






Heart Disease






Lyme Disease






Multiple Sclerosis






Pulmonary fibrosis






Scleroderma






Stroke










What Others Are Saying







I've been using umbilical cord stem cells on my patients for over 15 years and I had to use a lot of them to see some results, but I never got close to the results that I see using Stemaid's stem cells.  Dr C. My PSA was at 21 when I started Stemaid's program. After two weeks of their rejuvenation protocol it was at 11.  Tom F.They said the refraction was 40 percent! My refraction hasn't been that good for at least 15 to 20 years.  Randy (Heart Disease)There isn't any doubt in my mind that Stemaid saved our daughter's life.  Laura G. (Lyme Disease)I thank God everyday for helping me find the remarkable positive effects that were possible through Stemaid treatments.  Charlene L (Heart Disease)







Read More







Get in Touch
Whether you're a patient seeking stem cell therapy or a doctor seeking stem cells for your patients, please feel free to get in touch with us.

Send Us a Message
OR
Call us toll-free on 1-844-STEMAID




This web site requires that javascript be enabled. Click here for instructions..

      


















Stemaid™ : Embryonic Stem-cells




































×
 


Loading…


Close


























What is Stem Cell Therapy?
A stem cell is an undifferentiated cell that has the potential to divide and differentiate into any of the 220 cell-types of the human body.

					 Stem Cell Therapy (SCT), is the utilization of these cells in order to assist the body in the healing and regeneration of its existing cells.
Depending on the conditions, stem cells can be delivered through the blood stream or directly to the organ that is in need of treatment. Within 30 minutes of their delivery, the body starts to repair its damaged organs and the healing process can be observed up to 10 days after the injection. Several injections might be needed depending on the severity of the conditions and the expected results.








Your Source for Embryonic Stem-Cells
Embryonic Stem Cells are the most regenerative cells tested to date surpassing that of umblical-cord and adult stem cells.
	                We offer embryonic stem-cells and unique protocols to doctors and clinics that wish to provide safe and effective stem cell therapies to their patients.




Whether an individual is facing major health conditions or simply wishes to stay young and healthy, our embryonic stem-cells protocols can be highly beneficial.
We are the only company in the world offering embryonic stem-cells that have been tested for purity and safety in accordance with international standards.
Our Embryonic Stem Cells are grown without animal feeder layers and thus do not present any contamination danger.
Embryonic stem cells are up to 6x more potent in their ability to help the human body heal itself than that of adult stem cells or umbilical stem cells. While autologous-embryonic stem cells are up to 10x more potent.


Comparitive Efficacy in %* Chart results are approximations based on preliminary studies







SAFE & EFFECTIVE






Embryonic Without The Ethical Concerns
Gone are the days when donated embryos were required to make embryonic stem cells. Stemaid™ utilizes an advanced process to reset a regular adult skin cell back to an embryonic state from which we derive our stem cell lines. In other words, potential-life plays no part in our production process.
	                We can even create a custom stem cell line from a patient's own skin sample. These are known as autologous embryonic stem cells. 










Pioneers in Embryonic Stem Cell Production
We were the first company in the world to produce embryonic stem cells for therapeutic use. With over a decade of experience, you can trust that our stem cells are safe and reliable.







2004


Company established and dedicated research begins.








2007


Clinical trials begin.








2010


Commencement of stem-cell distribution








2012


Commence production of skin-cell-derived embryonic stem-cells.


















Treatable Diseases
Below is a list of conditions which have proven responsive to Stem Cell Therapy. If your condition is not shown in this list, please inquire with our medical team. New applications are always under development and we will give you the latest updates for your condition.





Aging






Autism






Alzheimer's Disease






Brain Injury






Cerebral Palsy






Epilepsy






Heart Disease






Lyme Disease






Multiple Sclerosis






Pulmonary fibrosis






Scleroderma






Stroke










What Others Are Saying







I've been using umbilical cord stem cells on my patients for over 15 years and I had to use a lot of them to see some results, but I never got close to the results that I see using Stemaid's stem cells.  Dr C. My PSA was at 21 when I started Stemaid's program. After two weeks of their rejuvenation protocol it was at 11.  Tom F.They said the refraction was 40 percent! My refraction hasn't been that good for at least 15 to 20 years.  Randy (Heart Disease)There isn't any doubt in my mind that Stemaid saved our daughter's life.  Laura G. (Lyme Disease)I thank God everyday for helping me find the remarkable positive effects that were possible through Stemaid treatments.  Charlene L (Heart Disease)







Read More







Get in Touch
Whether you're a patient seeking stem cell therapy or a doctor seeking stem cells for your patients, please feel free to get in touch with us.

Send Us a Message
OR
Call us toll-free on 1-844-STEMAID




This web site requires that javascript be enabled. Click here for instructions..

      










StemCells, Inc. - Investor Relations - Investor  Home




Investor RelationsFollow StemCells, Inc. on TwitterKeep up with StemCells, Inc. on LinkedInGroundbreaking science. Breakthrough medicine.™About UsOverviewWhat Sets Us ApartPeopleCareersContactScienceOverviewThe Promise of Stem CellsStem Cells 101Our Pre-clinical StudiesPublicationsIntellectual PropertyLicenseesResearch CollaborationsResources / LinksClinical ProgramsOverviewOur Clinical ApproachHuCNS-SC® Platform TechnologySpinal Cord Injury (SCI)Age-related Macular Degeneration (AMD)Pelizaeus-Merzbacher Disease (PMD)Neuronal Ceroid Lipofuscinosis (NCL)News & EventsNews & EventsEventsIn the MediaVideo LibraryInvestorsInvestors HomeStock DataFundamentalsAnalyst CoverageFirst Call EstimatesCorporate GovernancePresentationsEvent CalendarNews ReleasesSEC FilingsInformation RequestEmail AlertsIR ContactsContactInvestors HomeStock Data Stock QuoteStock ChartHistorical Price LookupInvestment CalculatorTrading StatisticsOwnership SummaryAnalyst CoverageFirst Call EstimatesCorporate Governance DocumentsLeadership TeamBoard of DirectorsCommittee CompositionPresentationsEvent Calendar Upcoming EventsPast EventsNews ReleasesSEC FilingsInformation RequestE-mail AlertsIR ContactsInvestorsNASDAQ: STEM
Listed on the NASDAQ Market since 1992, we are committed to balancing our standards of scientific rigor and clinical integrity with our corporate imperatives of value creation and long-term business sustainability.Corporate ProfileStemCells, Inc. is poised to be among the first to market stem cell-based therapeutic products to treat diseases and disorders of the central nervous system (CNS). The Company’s proprietary HuCNS-SC® (purified human neural stem cells) platform technology is currently in clinical development for chronic spinal cord injury (SCI). Expandable and bankable, HuCNS-SC cells can ultimately be "manufactured" at commercial-scale as "stem cells in a bottle," then distributed for patient doses, much like an off-the-shelf pharmaceutical product.
Driven by more than 20 years of pio...  More >>Learn more about What Sets Us Apart.StemCells, Inc. has been listed on the NASDAQ Market since 1992.Letter to Investors
January 2015  Letter to Investors from CEO Martin McGlynnRecent News10/27/16StemCells, Inc. Encourages Stockholders to Return Proxies Approving the Microbot Merger by November 14, 2016Four of Five Proposals Approved at Company’s 2016 Special Stockholder Meeting
NEWARK, Calif., Oct.  27, 2016  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- StemCells, Inc. (NASDAQ:STEM) reported today that four of the five proposals presented at the stockholder meeting in connection with the Company’s planned merger transaction with Microbot Medical Ltd. (Microbot) were approved yesterday.  The first proposal – to approve and adopt the Agreement and Plan of Merger and Reorganization with Microbot – was not taken up for ... 08/16/16StemCells, Inc. and Microbot Medical Ltd. Announce Strategic MergerCompanies Plan to Pursue Development of Robotics Based Medical Devices for the Treatment of Cerebrospinal Fluid and Gastrointestinal Disorders, as Well as Other Conditions
NEWARK, Calif. and YOKNEAM, Israel, Aug.  16, 2016  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- StemCells, Inc. (NASDAQ:STEM) and Microbot Medical Ltd., a private company organized under the laws of the State of Israel (“Microbot”), today announced that they have entered into a definitive merger agreement, with plans to pursue the development of rob... More >>Upcoming EventsThere are currently no events scheduled.PresentationsDateTitle03/24/16 Q4 2015 StemCells, Inc. Earnings Conference CallGet help downloading or viewing the above file types
					Receive E-mail AlertsSign up to receive e-mail alerts whenever StemCells, Inc. posts new information to the site. Just enter your e-mail address and click Submit.


Enter your e-mail address here:

Replication or redistribution of EDGAR Online, Inc. content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of EDGAR Online, Inc. EDGAR Online, Inc. shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.Stock Quote
STEM (Common Stock)
			  ExchangeNASDAQ (US Dollar)Price$6.40Change (%)  0.27 (4.05%)Volume70,704Data as of 12/30/16 4:00 p.m. ETMinimum 20 minute delayRefresh quoteAnalyst CoverageClick  here for a list of   analysts covering StemCells, Inc.Primary IR ContactGreg Schiffman 
CFO
StemCells, Inc.
7707 Gateway Blvd
Newark, CA 94560Phone: 510.456.4128Fax: 650.475.3101  Contact by e-mailInvestor ToolsPrint PageE-mail PageRSS FeedsE-mail AlertsFinancial Tear SheetHomeLegal NoticesCareersSite Map © 2000 -
      
      StemCells, Inc. All Rights Reserved.